Hawaii statutes.
§634-37 Presumption of notice and service
of process in child support cases. Whenever notice and service of process
is required for child support enforcement proceedings subsequent to an order
issued pursuant to chapter 571, 576B, 576E, 580, or 584, upon a showing that
diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, notice and
service of process shall be presumed to be satisfied upon delivery of written
notice to the most recent residential or employer address on file with the
state case registry pursuant to section 571-52.6. [L 1997, c 293, §9; am L
1998, c 11, §32 and c 83, §11]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next